North Carolina, session 2025, SB125.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. REORGANIZATION OF CHAPTER 115D
SECTION 1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 1.
"General Provisions for State Administration.
"Part 1. Establishment and Administration of the North Carolina Community Colleges System.
"§ 115D-1. Statement of purpose.
The purposes of this Chapter are to provide for the establishment, organization, and
administration of a system of educational institutions throughout the State offering courses of
instruction in one or more of the general areas of two-year college parallel, technical, vocational,
and adult education programs, to serve as a legislative charter for such institutions, and to
authorize the levying of local taxes and the issuing of local bonds for the support thereof. The
major purpose of each and every institution operating under the provisions of this Chapter shall
be and shall continue to be the offering of vocational and technical education and training, and
of basic, high school level, academic education needed in order to profit from vocational and
technical education, for students who are high school graduates or who are beyond the
compulsory age limit of the public school system and who have left the public schools, provided,
juveniles of any age committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public
Safety by a court of competent jurisdiction may, if approved by the director of the youth
development center to which they are assigned, take courses offered by institutions of the system
if they are otherwise qualified for admission.
The Community Colleges System Office is designated as the primary lead agency for
delivering workforce development training, adult literacy training, and adult education programs
in the State.
…
"§ 115D-1.3. Accreditation of secondary school located in North Carolina shall not be a
factor in admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational policies.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "accreditation" shall include certification or any
other similar approval process.
(b) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy that prohibits any
community college from soliciting or using information regarding the accreditation of a
secondary school located in North Carolina that a person attended as a factor affecting
admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational activity at the community college, unless
the accreditation was conducted by a State agency.
…
*S125-v-5*

"§ 115D-4.1. College transfer program approval; standards for programs; annual
reporting requirements.
(a) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 288, s. 1, effective September 1, 1995.
(b) The State Board of Community Colleges may approve the addition of the college
transfer program to a community college. If addition of the college transfer program to an
institution would require a substantial increase in funds, State Board approval shall be subject to
appropriation of funds by the General Assembly for this purpose.
(c) Addition of the college transfer program shall not decrease an institution's ability to
provide programs within its basic mission of vocational and technical training and basic academic
education.
(d) The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop appropriate criteria and
standards to regulate the addition of the college transfer program to institutions.
(e) The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop appropriate criteria and
standards to regulate the operation of college transfer programs.
(f) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall report to each
community college and to the State Board of Community Colleges in accordance with
G.S. 116-11(10b) on the academic performance of that community college's transfer students. If
the State Board of Community Colleges finds that college transfer students from a community
college are not consistently performing adequately at a four-year college, the Board shall review
the community college's program and determine what steps are necessary to remedy the problem.
The Board shall report annually to the General Assembly on the reports it receives and on what
steps it is taking to remedy problems that it finds.
(g) The Community Colleges System Office shall report by April 15, 2011, and annually
thereafter, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the State Board of Education,
the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General
Assembly on the implementation of the UNC-NCCCS 2+2 E-Learning Initiative. This report
shall include:
(1) The courses and programs within the 2+2 E-Learning Initiative;
(2) The total number of prospective teachers that have taken or are taking part in
this initiative to date broken down by the current academic period and each of
the previous academic periods since the program’s inception;
(3) The total number of teachers currently in the State’s classrooms, by local
school administrative unit, who have taken part in this initiative;
(4) The change in the number of teachers available to schools since the program’s
inception;
(5) The qualitative data from students, teachers, local school administrative unit
personnel, university personnel, and community college personnel as to the
impact of this initiative on our State’s teaching pool; and
(6) An explanation of the expenditures and collaborative programs between the
North Carolina Community College System and The University of North
Carolina, including recommendations for improvement.
"§ 115D-5. Administration of institutions by State Board of Community Colleges;
personnel exempt from North Carolina Human Resources Act; extension
courses; tuition waiver; in-plant training; contracting, etc., for establishment
and operation of extension units of the community college system; use of existing
public school facilities.
(a) The State Board of Community Colleges may adopt and execute such policies,
regulations and standards concerning the establishment, administration, and operation of
institutions as the State Board may deem necessary to insure the quality of educational programs,
to promote the systematic meeting of educational needs of the State, and to provide for the
equitable distribution of State and federal funds to the several institutions.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish standards and scales for salaries and
allotments paid from funds administered by the State Board, and all employees of the institutions
shall be exempt from the provisions of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. Any and all
salary caps set by the State Board for community college presidents shall apply only to the
State-paid portion of the salary. Except as otherwise provided by law, the employer contribution
rate on the local-paid portion of the salary, to be paid from local funds, shall be set by the State
Treasurer based on actuarial recommendations. The State Board shall have authority with respect
to individual institutions: to approve sites, capital improvement projects, budgets; to approve the
selection of the chief administrative officer; to establish and administer standards for professional
personnel, curricula, admissions, and graduation; to regulate the awarding of degrees, diplomas,
and certificates; to establish and regulate student tuition and fees within policies for tuition and
fees established by the General Assembly; and to establish and regulate financial accounting
procedures.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall require each community college to meet the
faculty credential requirements of its accrediting agency for all community college programs.
(a1) Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58(c)(3) or any other provisions of law, the State Board of
Community Colleges may adopt rules governing the expenditure of funds derived from bookstore
sales by community colleges. These expenditures shall be consistent with the mission and
purpose of the Community College System. Profits may be used in the support and enhancement
of the bookstores, for student aid or scholarships, for expenditures of direct benefit to students,
and for other similar expenditures authorized by the board of trustees, subject to rules adopted
by the State Board. These funds shall not be used to supplement salaries of any personnel.
(a2) The State Board of Community Colleges shall comply with the provisions of
G.S. 116-11(10a) to plan and implement an exchange of information between the public schools
and the institutions of higher education in the State.
(a3) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt the following rules to assist
community colleges in their administration of procedures necessary to implement G.S. 20-11 and
G.S. 20-13.2:
(1) To establish the procedures a person who is or was enrolled in a community
college must follow and the requirements that person must meet to obtain a
driving eligibility certificate.
(2) To require the person who is required under G.S. 20-11(n) to sign the driving
eligibility certificate to provide the certificate if he or she determines that one
of the following requirements is met:
a. The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under
G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and is not subject to G.S. 20-11(n1).
b. The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under
G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and G.S. 20-11(n1).
(3) To provide for an appeal through the grievance procedures established by the
board of trustees of each community college by a person who is denied a
driving eligibility certificate.
(4) To define exemplary student behavior and to define what constitutes the
successful completion of a drug or alcohol treatment counseling program.
The State Board also shall develop policies as to when it is appropriate to
notify the Division of Motor Vehicles that a person who is or was enrolled in
a community college no longer meets the requirements for a driving eligibility
certificate. The State Board also shall adopt guidelines to assist the presidents
of community colleges in their designation of representatives to sign driving
eligibility certificates.
The State Board shall develop a form for the appropriate individuals to
provide their written, irrevocable consent for a community college to disclose
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 3

to the Division of Motor Vehicles that the student no longer meets the
conditions for a driving eligibility certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1) or
G.S. 20-11(n1), if applicable, in the event that this disclosure is necessary to
comply with G.S. 20-11 or G.S. 20-13.2. Other than identifying under which
statutory subsection the student is no longer eligible, no other details or
information concerning the student's school record shall be released pursuant
to this consent.
(b) In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of
curricular courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from
institution campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata
portion of the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a
part-time student taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of
Community Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform
registration fees, to be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is
financed primarily from State funds. The State Board of Community Colleges may provide by
general and uniform regulations for waiver of tuition and registration fees for the following:
(1) Persons not enrolled in elementary or secondary schools taking courses
leading to a high school diploma or equivalent certificate.
(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board
of Community Colleges:
a. Volunteer fire departments.
b. Municipal, county, or State fire departments.
c. Volunteer EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
d. Municipal, county, or State EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
d1. Law enforcement, fire, EMS or rescue and lifesaving entities serving
a lake authority that was created by a county board of commissioners
prior to July 1, 2012.
e. Radio Emergency Associated Communications Teams (REACT)
under contract to a county as an emergency response agency.
f. Municipal, county, or State law enforcement agencies.
f1. Campus police agencies of private institutions of higher education
certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the
General Statutes.
g. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the
Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the
training of full-time custodial employees and employees of the
Divisions required to be certified under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of
the General Statutes and the rules of the Criminal Justice and Training
Standards Commission.
h. Repealed by Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhh), effective December
1, 2017.
i. The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians law enforcement, fire, EMS or
rescue and lifesaving tribal government departments or programs.
j. The Criminal Justice Standards Division of the Department of Justice
for the training of criminal justice professionals, as defined in
G.S. 17C-20(6), who are required to be certified under (i) Article 1 of
Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the North
Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission or (ii) Chapter 17E of the General Statutes and the rules
of the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards
Page 4 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

Commission. The waivers provided for in this sub-subdivision apply
to participants and recent graduates of the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Fellows Program to obtain certifications for eligible criminal
justice professions as defined in G.S. 17C-20(6).
(2a) Firefighters, EMS personnel, and rescue and lifesaving personnel whose duty
station is located on a military installation within North Carolina for courses
that support their organizations' training needs and are approved for this
purpose by the State Board of Community Colleges.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1, 2011.
(4) Trainees enrolled in courses conducted under the Customized Training
Program.
(5) through (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1,
2011.
(10) Elementary and secondary school employees enrolled in courses in first aid or
cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).
(11) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 10.6, effective July 1, 2013.
(12) All courses taken by high school students at community colleges, in
accordance with G.S. 115D-20(4) and this section.
(13) Human resources development courses for any individual who (i) is
unemployed; (ii) has received notification of a pending layoff; (iii) is working
and is eligible for the Federal Earned Income Tax Credit (FEITC); or (iv) is
working and earning wages at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the
federal poverty guidelines.
(14) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 8.12(a), effective July 1, 2011.
(15) Courses providing employability skills, job-specific occupational or technical
skills, or developmental education instruction to certain students who are
concurrently enrolled in an eligible community college literacy course, in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges.
(16) Courses provided to students who are participating in a pre-apprenticeship or
apprenticeship program that meets all of the following criteria:
a. Meets one of the following:
1. Is a registered apprenticeship program recognized by the
United States Department of Labor.
2. Is a pre-apprenticeship program recognized and approved by
the State agency administering the statewide apprenticeship
program.
b. Has a documented plan of study with courses relating to a job-specific
occupational or technical skill.
c. Requires the participants in the program to be North Carolina high
school students when entering the program.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall not waive tuition and registration fees for other
individuals.
(b1) The State Board of Community Colleges shall not waive tuition and registration fees
for community college faculty or staff members. Community colleges may, however, use State
or local funds to pay tuition and registration fees for one course per semester for full-time
community college faculty or staff members employed for a nine-, ten-, eleven-, or twelve-month
term. Community colleges may also use State and local funds to pay tuition and registration fees
for professional development courses and for other courses consistent with the academic
assistance program authorized by the State Human Resources Commission.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 5

(b2) Beginning February 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the Community Colleges
System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the number
and type of waivers granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(c) No course of instruction shall be offered by any community college at State expense
or partial State expense to any captive or co-opted group of students, as defined by the State
Board of Community Colleges, without prior approval of the State Board of Community
Colleges. All course offerings approved for State prison inmates or prisoners in local jails must
be tied to clearly identified job skills, transition needs, or both. Approval by the State Board of
Community Colleges shall be presumed to constitute approval of both the course and the group
served by that institution. The State Board of Community Colleges may delegate to the President
the power to make an initial approval, with final approval to be made by the State Board of
Community Colleges. A course taught without such approval will not yield any full-time
equivalent students, as defined by the State Board of Community Colleges.
(c1) Community colleges shall report full-time equivalent (FTE) student hours for
correction education programs on the basis of student membership hours. No community college
shall operate a multi-entry/multi-exit class or program in a prison facility, except for a literacy
class or program.
The State Board shall work with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the
Department of Public Safety on offering classes and programs that match the average length of
stay of an inmate in a prison facility.
(c2) Courses in federal prisons shall not earn regular budget full-time equivalents, but may
be offered on a self-supporting basis.
(c3) Funds appropriated for community college courses for prison inmates shall be used
only for inmates in State prisons. The first priority for the use of these funds shall be to restore
the FTE for basic skills courses to the FY 2008-2009 level. Funds not needed for this purpose
may be used for continuing education and curriculum courses related to job skills training.
(d) Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(a) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July
1, 2005.
(e) Repealed by Session Laws 1999-84, s. 3, effective May 21, 1999.
(f) A community college may not offer a new program without the approval of the State
Board of Community Colleges except that approval shall not be required if the tuition for the
program will fully cover the cost of the program. If at any time tuition fails to fully cover the cost
of a program that falls under the exception, the program shall be discontinued unless approved
by the State Board of Community Colleges. If a proposed new program would serve more than
one community college, the State Board of Community Colleges shall perform a feasibility study
prior to acting on the proposal. The State Board of Community Colleges shall consider whether
a regional approach can be used when developing new programs and, to the extent possible, shall
initiate new programs on a regional basis.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall collect data on an annual basis on all new
programs and program terminations it approved and any regionalization of programs during the
year, including the specific reasons for which each program was terminated or approved.
(f1) The State Board shall adopt a policy requiring community colleges to be accredited
in accordance with G.S. 115D-6.2.
(g) Funds appropriated to the Community Colleges System Office as operating expenses
for allocation to the institutions comprising the North Carolina Community College System shall
not be used to support recreation extension courses. The financing of these courses by any
institution shall be on a self-supporting basis, and membership hours produced from these
activities shall not be counted when computing full-time equivalent students (FTE) for use in
budget-funding formulas at the State level.
(h) Whenever a community college offers real estate continuing education courses
pursuant to G.S. 93A-4.1, the courses shall be offered on a self-supporting basis.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(i) Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(c) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July
1, 2005.
(j) The State Board of Community Colleges shall use its Board Reserve Fund for
feasibility studies, pilot projects, start-up of new programs, and innovative ideas.
(k) Recodified as G.S. 115D-5.1(b) by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July
1, 2005.
(l) The State Board shall review and approve lease purchase and installment purchase
contracts as provided under G.S. 115D-58.15(b). The State Board shall adopt policies and
procedures governing the review and approval process.
(m) The State Board of Community Colleges shall maintain an accountability function
that conducts periodic reviews of each community college operating under the provisions of this
Chapter. The purpose of the compliance review shall be to ensure that (i) data used to allocate
State funds among community colleges is reported accurately to the System Office and (ii)
community colleges are charging and waiving tuition and registration fees consistent with law.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall require the use of a statistically valid sample size
in performing compliance reviews of community colleges. All compliance review findings that
are determined to be material shall be forwarded to the college president, local college board of
trustees, the State Board of Community Colleges, and the State Auditor. The State Board of
Community Colleges shall adopt rules governing the frequency, scope, and standard of
materiality for compliance reviews.
(n) The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall provide the Department
of Revenue with a list of all community colleges, including name, address, and other identifying
information requested by the Department of Revenue. The North Carolina Community Colleges
System Office shall update this list whenever there is a change.
(o) All multicampus centers approved by the State Board of Community Colleges shall
receive funding under the same formula. The State Board of Community Colleges shall not
approve any additional multicampus centers without identified recurring sources of funding. A
community college facility shall be considered a multicampus center if it meets all of the
following criteria:
(1) Is at least 4 miles away from the main campus of the community college and
other multicampus center locations.
(2) Any other criteria established by the State Board.
(p) The North Carolina Community College System may offer courses, in accordance
with Article 17D of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, to individuals who
choose to enter the teaching profession through residency licensure.
(q) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 8.9, effective July 1, 2009.
(r) The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop curriculum and continuing
education standards for courses of instruction in American Sign Language and shall encourage
community colleges to offer courses in American Sign Language as a modern foreign language.
(s) The State Board of Community Colleges may establish, retain and budget fees
charged to students taking an adult high school equivalency diploma test, including fees for
retesting. Fees collected for this purpose shall be used only to (i) offset the costs of the test,
including the cost of scoring the test, (ii) offset the costs of printing adult high school equivalency
diplomas, and (iii) meet federal and State reporting requirements related to the test.
(t) The purpose of the first semester of the Gateway to College Program is to address
additional support to successfully complete the program. Students may need to take
developmental courses necessary for the transition to more challenging courses; therefore, the
State Board of Community Colleges shall (i) permit high school students who are enrolled in
Gateway to College Programs to enroll in developmental courses based on an assessment of their
individual student needs by a high school and community college staff team and (ii) include this
coursework in computing the budget FTE for the colleges.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 7

(u) The State Board of Community Colleges shall direct each community college to adopt
a policy that authorizes a minimum of two excused absences each academic year for religious
observances required by the faith of a student. The policy may require that the student provide
written notice of the request for an excused absence a reasonable time prior to the religious
observance. The policy shall also provide that the student shall be given the opportunity to make
up any tests or other work missed due to an excused absence for a religious observance.
(v) Community colleges may teach curriculum courses at any time during the year,
including the summer term. Student membership hours from these courses shall be counted when
computing full-time equivalent students (FTE) for use in budget funding formulas at the State
level.
(w) The State Board of Community Colleges shall review, at least every five years,
service areas that include counties assigned to more than one community college to determine
the feasibility of continuing to assign those counties to more than one community college. The
State Board shall revise service areas as needed to ensure that counties are served effectively.
The first review and any revisions shall be completed no later than March 1, 2016, and the State
Board shall report its findings and any revisions to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee no later than March 1, 2016. All subsequent reviews and revisions shall also be
submitted to the Committee.
(x) In addition to the evaluation of cooperative innovative high schools by the State Board
of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-238.55, the State Board of Community Colleges, in
conjunction with the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of The University of
North Carolina, shall evaluate the success of students participating in the Career and College
Promise Program, including the College Transfer pathway and the Career and Technical
Education pathway. Success shall be measured by high school retention rates, high school
completion rates, high school dropout rates, certification and associate degree completion,
admission to four-year institutions, postgraduation employment in career or study-related fields,
and employer satisfaction of employees who participated in the programs. The evaluation shall
also include an analysis of the cost of students participating in each of the programs within the
Career and College Promise Program, including at least the following:
(1) Total enrollment funding, the number of budgeted full-time equivalent
students, and the number of students enrolled in courses through cooperative
innovative high schools, the College Transfer pathway, and the Career and
Technical Education pathway.
(2) The cost and number of waivers of tuition and registration fees provided for
students enrolled in courses through cooperative innovative high schools, the
College Transfer pathway, and the Career and Technical Education pathway.
(3) Any additional costs of a student attending courses on campus if a student is
not attending public school in a local school administrative unit for the
majority of the student's instructional time.
The Boards shall jointly report by March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the
House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General
Assembly. The report shall be combined with the evaluation of cooperative innovative high
schools required by G.S. 115C-238.55, and the Community Colleges System Office shall be
responsible for submitting the combined report.
(y) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy to be applied uniformly
throughout the Community College System to provide that any student enrolled in a community
college who is a National Guard service member placed onto State active duty status during an
academic term shall be given an excused absence for the period of time the student is on active
duty. The policy shall further provide all of the following:
Page 8 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(1) The student shall be given the opportunity to make up any test or other work
missed during the excused absence.
(2) The student shall be given the option, when feasible, to continue classes and
coursework during the academic term through online participation for the
period of time the student is placed on active duty.
(3) The student shall be given the option of receiving a temporary grade of
"incomplete (IN)" or "absent from the final exam (AB)" for any course that
the student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active
duty status; however, the student must complete the course requirements
within the period of time specified by the community college to avoid
receiving a failing grade for the course.
(4) The student shall be permitted to drop, with no penalty, any course that the
student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active duty
status.
(z) The State Board of Community Colleges shall monitor community colleges for
compliance with Article 38 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes. If the State Board determines
that a community college is in violation of Article 38, it shall report the identity of the community
college to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee.
"§ 115D-5.1. Workforce Development Programs.
(a) Community colleges shall assist in the preemployment and in-service training of
employees in industry, business, agriculture, health occupation and governmental agencies. Such
training shall include instruction on worker safety and health standards and practices applicable
to the field of employment. The State Board of Community Colleges shall make appropriate
regulations including the establishment of maximum hours of instruction which may be offered
at State expense in each in-plant training program. No instructor or other employee of a
community college shall engage in the normal management, supervisory and operational
functions of the establishment in which the instruction is offered during the hours in which the
instructor or other employee is employed for instructional or educational purposes.
(b) through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 8.7(a), effective July 1, 2008.
(e) There is created within the North Carolina Community College System the
Customized Training Program. The Customized Training Program shall offer programs and
training services to assist new and existing business and industry to remain productive, profitable,
and within the State. Before a business or industry qualifies to receive assistance under the
Customized Training Program, the President of the North Carolina Community College System
shall determine that:
(1) The business is making an appreciable capital investment;
(2) The business is deploying new technology;
(2a) The business or individual is creating jobs, expanding an existing workforce,
or enhancing the productivity and profitability of the operations within the
State; and
(3) The skills of the workers will be enhanced by the assistance.
(f) The Community Colleges System Office shall report no later than September 1 of
each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on:
(1) The total amount of funds received by a company under the Customized
Training Program.
(1a) The types of services sought by the company, whether for new, expanding, or
existing industry.
(2) The amount of funds per trainee received by that company.
(3) The amount of funds received per trainee by the community college delivering
the training.
(4) The number of trainees trained by the company and community college.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 9

(5) The number of years that company has been funded.
(f1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Board of Community Colleges
may adopt guidelines that allow the Customized Training Program to use funds appropriated for
that program to support training projects for the various branches of the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(f2) Funds available to the Customized Training Program shall not revert at the end of a
fiscal year but shall remain available until expended. Up to ten percent (10%) of the
college-delivered training expenditures and up to five percent (5%) of the contractor-delivered
training expenditures for the prior fiscal year for Customized Training may be allotted to each
college for capacity building at that college.
(f3) Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Programs, the
State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to eight percent (8%) for the
training and support of regional community college personnel to deliver Customized Training
Program services to business and industry.
(g) The State Board shall adopt guidelines to implement this section. At least 20 days
before the effective date of any criteria or nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the State
Board must publish the proposed guidelines on the Community Colleges System Office's web
site and provide notice to persons who have requested notice of proposed guidelines. In addition,
the State Board must accept oral and written comments on the proposed guidelines during the 15
business days beginning on the first day that the State Board has completed these notifications.
For the purpose of this subsection, a technical amendment is either of the following:
(1) An amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error.
(2) An amendment that makes a clarification based on public comment and could
have been anticipated by the public notice that immediately preceded the
public comment.
"§ 115D-5.1A. Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
(a) Program Established. – There is established the North Carolina Community College
Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program (Program) to be administered by the State
Board of Community Colleges. The State Board shall adopt rules for the disbursement of the
grants pursuant to this section.
(b) Programs of Study. – The State Board of Community Colleges, in collaboration with
the Department of Commerce, shall determine the eligible programs of study for the Program,
according to the occupations that are in the highest demand in the State. The eligible programs
of study shall include programs such as architecture and construction, health sciences,
information technology, electrical line worker, and manufacturing programs and may include
other programs to meet local workforce needs.
(c) Award Amounts. – To the extent funds are made available for the Program, the State
Board of Community Colleges shall award grants in an amount of up to seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) to students pursuing short-term, noncredit State and industry workforce
credentials. The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish criteria for initial and
continuing eligibility for students. At a minimum, students shall be required to qualify as a
resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1 and in accordance with
the coordinated and centralized residency determination process administered by the State
Education Assistance Authority.
(d) Report. – The State Board shall submit a report by April 1, 2024, and annually
thereafter, on the Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division. The report shall contain, for each academic year and by programs of study,
the amount of grant funds disbursed and the number of eligible students receiving funds.
"§ 115D-5.2. Commercial fishing and aquaculture classes.
(a) The General Assembly urges all community colleges serving the coastal area of the
State to offer classes on commercial fishing and aquaculture.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(b) The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall provide technical
assistance to these colleges on offering such classes.
(c) The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on any fiscal and administrative issues it identifies
that limit colleges' ability to offer such courses.
"§ 115D-5.5. Board Reserve Fund.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall use its Board Reserve Fund for feasibility
studies, pilot projects, start-up of new programs, and innovative ideas.
"Part 2. Administration of Local Community Colleges by State Board of Community Colleges.
"§ 115D-6. Withdrawal of State support.
The State Board of Community Colleges may withdraw or withhold State financial and
administrative support of any institutions subject to the provisions of this Chapter in the event
that:of any of the following:
(1) The required local financial support of an institution is not provided;provided.
(2) Sufficient State funds are not available;available.
(3) The officials of an institution refuse or are unable to maintain prescribed
standards of administration or instruction; orinstruction.
(4) Local educational needs for such an institution cease to exist.
"§ 115D-6.1. Administration of institutions.
(a) Policies. – The State Board of Community Colleges may adopt and execute such
policies, regulations, and standards concerning the establishment, administration, and operation
of institutions as the State Board may deem necessary to ensure the quality of educational
programs, to promote the systematic meeting of educational needs of the State, and to provide
for the equitable distribution of State and federal funds to the several institutions.
(b) Authority. – The State Board shall have the following authority with respect to
individual institutions:
(1) To approve sites, capital improvement projects, and budgets.
(2) To approve the selection of the chief administrative officer.
(3) To establish and administer standards for professional personnel, curricula,
admissions, and graduation.
(4) To regulate the awarding of degrees, diplomas, and certificates.
(5) To establish and regulate student tuition and fees within policies for tuition
and fees established by the General Assembly.
(6) To establish and regulate financial accounting procedures.
(c) Salaries. – The State Board shall establish standards and scales for salaries and
allotments paid from funds administered by the State Board, and all employees of the institutions
shall be exempt from the provisions of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. Any and all
salary caps set by the State Board for community college presidents shall apply only to the
State-paid portion of the salary. Except as otherwise provided by law, the employer contribution
rate on the local-paid portion of the salary, to be paid from local funds, shall be set by the State
Treasurer based on actuarial recommendations.
(d) Faculty Credentials. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall require each
community college to meet the faculty credential requirements of its accrediting agency for all
community college programs.
"§ 115D-6.2. Accreditation.Accreditation policy.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy requiring community colleges
to be accredited in accordance with G.S. 115D-21.2.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Accreditation cycle. – The period of time during which a community college
is accredited.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 11

(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
(3) Regional accrediting agency. – One of the following accrediting agencies:
a. Higher Learning Commission.
b. Middle States Commission on Higher Education.
c. New England Commission on Higher Education.
d. Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.
e. Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges.
f. Western Association of Schools and Colleges Accrediting
Commission for Community and Junior Colleges.
(b) Prohibit Consecutive Accreditation by an Accrediting Agency. – A community
college shall not receive accreditation by an accrediting agency for consecutive accreditation
cycles except as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Accreditation Transfer Procedure. – A community college that pursues accreditation
with a different accrediting agency in accordance with this section shall pursue accreditation with
a regional accrediting agency. If the community college is not granted candidacy status by any
regional accrediting agency that is different from its current accrediting agency at least three
years prior to the expiration of its current accreditation, the community college may remain with
its current accrediting agency for an additional accreditation cycle.
(d) Certain Programs Exempt. – The requirements of this section do not apply to
professional, departmental, or certificate programs at community colleges that have specific
accreditation requirements or best practices, as identified by the State Board of Community
Colleges.
(e) Cause of Action. – A community college may bring a civil action, as follows:
(1) Against any person who makes a false statement to the accrediting agency of
the community college, if all of the following criteria are met:
a. The statement, if true, would mean the community college is out of
compliance with its accreditation standards.
b. The person made the statement with knowledge that the statement was
false or with reckless disregard as to whether it was false.
c. The accrediting agency conducted a review of the community college
as a proximate result of the statement.
d. The review caused the community college to incur costs.
(2) A community college that prevails on a cause of action initiated pursuant to
this subsection shall be entitled to the following:
a. Costs related to the review conducted by the accrediting agency,
including for the following:
1. Additional hours worked by community college personnel.
2. Contracted services, including outside legal counsel.
3. Travel, lodging, and food expenses.
4. Fees required by the agency.
b. Reasonable attorney fees.
c. Court costs.
"§ 115D-6.5. Notice of noncompliance; appointment of an interim board of trustees.
…
(c) Interim Board Assumption of Powers and Duties. – The adoption of the resolution to
remove the full board under this section shall have the effect of vacating the terms of all of the
members serving on the board of trustees. Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-12, the State Board of
Community Colleges shall appoint an interim five-member board of trustees for a period not to
exceed 12 months with input from the advisory committee listed in subsection (a) of this section.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

To preserve local autonomy, the appointing authorities of the local administrative area of the
community college under G.S. 115D-12 shall make recommendations to the State Board on the
appointment of the members to the interim board of trustees. All appointees to the interim board
of trustees shall be residents of the administrative area of the institution for which they are
selected or of counties contiguous thereto with the exception of members provided for in
subsection (a) of G.S. 115D-12, Group Four. G.S. 115D-12(a)(3). At the end of the period of
service of the interim board of trustees, a board of trustees for the community college shall be
appointed in accordance with G.S. 115D-12. Initial terms of members of the new board of
trustees shall be staggered to align with the remainder of the vacated terms of the members of the
board of trustees.
…
"§ 115D-9.5. Bookstore sales.
Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58(c)(3) or any other provisions of law, the State Board of
Community Colleges may adopt rules governing the expenditure of funds derived from bookstore
sales by community colleges. These expenditures shall be consistent with the mission and
purpose of the Community College System. Profits may be used in the support and enhancement
of the bookstores, for student aid or scholarships, for expenditures of direct benefit to students,
and for other similar expenditures authorized by the board of trustees, subject to rules adopted
by the State Board. These funds shall not be used to supplement salaries of any personnel.
"§ 115D-9.10. Exchange of information with The University of North Carolina and North
Carolina public schools.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall comply with the provisions of
G.S. 116-11(10a) to plan and implement an exchange of information between the public schools
and the institutions of higher education in the State.
"§ 115D-9.15. Lease purchase and installment purchase contracts.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall review and approve lease purchase and
installment purchase contracts as provided under G.S. 115D-58.15(b). The State Board shall
adopt policies and procedures governing the review and approval process.
"§ 115D-9.20. Compliance review and requested information.
(a) Compliance Review. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall maintain an
accountability function that conducts periodic reviews of each community college operating
under the provisions of this Chapter. The purpose of the compliance review shall be to ensure
that (i) data used to allocate State funds among community colleges is reported accurately to the
System Office and (ii) community colleges are charging and waiving tuition and registration fees
consistent with law. The State Board of Community Colleges shall require the use of a
statistically valid sample size in performing compliance reviews of community colleges. All
compliance review findings that are determined to be material shall be forwarded to the college
president, local college board of trustees, the State Board of Community Colleges, and the State
Auditor. The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt rules governing the frequency,
scope, and standard of materiality for compliance reviews.
(b) Information to Department of Revenue. – The North Carolina Community Colleges
System Office shall provide the Department of Revenue with a list of all community colleges,
including name, address, and other identifying information requested by the Department of
Revenue. The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall update this list whenever
there is a change.
"§ 115D-9.25. Multicampus centers.
All multicampus centers approved by the State Board of Community Colleges shall receive
funding under the same formula. The State Board of Community Colleges shall not approve any
additional multicampus centers without identified recurring sources of funding. A community
college facility shall be considered a multicampus center if it meets the criteria established by the
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 13

State Board and is at least 4 miles away from the main campus of the community college and
other multicampus center locations.
"§ 115D-9.30. Service areas.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall review, at least every five years, service areas
that include counties assigned to more than one community college to determine the feasibility
of continuing to assign those counties to more than one community college. The State Board
shall revise service areas as needed to ensure that counties are served effectively. The State Board
shall report its findings and any revisions to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee
within 60 days of revisions being made.
"§ 115D-9.35. Athletic teams.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall monitor community colleges for compliance
with Article 38 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes. If the State Board determines that a
community college is in violation of Article 38 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, it shall
report the identity of the community college to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee.
…
"Part 3. Community College Programs.
"§ 115D-10.5. Program funding.
(a) New Programs and Terminations of Programs. – A community college may not offer
a new program without the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges except that
approval shall not be required if the tuition for the program will fully cover the cost of the
program. If at any time tuition fails to fully cover the cost of a program that falls under the
exception, the program shall be discontinued unless approved by the State Board. If a proposed
new program would serve more than one community college, the State Board shall perform a
feasibility study prior to acting on the proposal. The State Board shall consider whether a regional
approach can be used when developing new programs and, to the extent possible, shall initiate
new programs on a regional basis. The State Board shall collect data on an annual basis on all
new programs and program terminations it approved and any regionalization of programs during
the year, including the specific reasons for which each program was terminated or approved.
(b) Recreation Extension Courses. – Funds appropriated to the Community Colleges
System Office as operating expenses for allocation to the institutions comprising the North
Carolina Community College System shall not be used to support recreation extension courses.
The financing of these courses by any institution shall be on a self-supporting basis, and
membership hours produced from these activities shall not be counted when computing full-time
equivalent students (FTE) for use in budget-funding formulas at the State level.
(c) Real Estate Continuing Education Courses. – Whenever a community college offers
real estate continuing education courses, the courses shall be offered on a self-supporting basis.
"§ 115D-10.10. College transfer program approval; standards for programs; annual
reporting requirements.
(a) The State Board of Community Colleges may approve the addition of the college
transfer program to a community college. If addition of the college transfer program to an
institution would require a substantial increase in funds, State Board approval shall be subject to
appropriation of funds by the General Assembly for this purpose.
(b) Addition of the college transfer program shall not decrease an institution's ability to
provide programs within its basic mission of vocational and technical training and basic academic
education.
(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop appropriate criteria and
standards to regulate the addition of the college transfer program to institutions.
(d) The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop appropriate criteria and
standards to regulate the operation of college transfer programs.
Page 14 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(e) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall report to each
community college and to the State Board of Community Colleges in accordance with
G.S. 116-11(10b) on the academic performance of that community college's transfer students. If
the State Board of Community Colleges finds that college transfer students from a community
college are not consistently performing adequately at a four-year college, the Board shall review
the community college's program and determine what steps are necessary to remedy the problem.
The Board shall report annually to the General Assembly on the reports it receives and on what
steps it is taking to remedy problems that it finds.
(f) The Community Colleges System Office shall report annually by April 15 to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the State Board of Education, the Office of State
Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly on the
implementation of the UNC-NCCCS 2+2 E-Learning Initiative. This report shall include the
following:
(1) The courses and programs within the 2+2 E-Learning Initiative.
(2) The total number of prospective teachers that have taken or are taking part in
this initiative to date broken down by the current academic period and each of
the previous academic periods since the program's inception.
(3) The total number of teachers currently in the State's classrooms, by local
school administrative unit, who have taken part in this initiative.
(4) The change in the number of teachers available to schools since the program's
inception.
(5) The qualitative data from students, teachers, local school administrative unit
personnel, university personnel, and community college personnel as to the
impact of this initiative on our State's teaching pool.
(6) An explanation of the expenditures and collaborative programs between the
North Carolina Community College System and The University of North
Carolina, including recommendations for improvement.
"§ 115D-10.15. Workforce development programs.
Community colleges shall assist in the preemployment and in-service training of employees
in industry, business, agriculture, health occupation, and governmental agencies. Such training
shall include instruction on worker safety and health standards and practices applicable to the
field of employment. The State Board of Community Colleges shall make appropriate
regulations, including the establishment of maximum hours of instruction which may be offered
at State expense in each in-plant training program. No instructor or other employee of a
community college shall engage in the normal management, supervisory, and operational
functions of the establishment in which the instruction is offered during the hours in which the
instructor or other employee is employed for instructional or educational purposes.
"§ 115D-10.17. Customized Training Program.
(a) There is created within the North Carolina Community College System the
Customized Training Program. The Customized Training Program shall offer programs and
training services to assist new and existing business and industry to remain productive, profitable,
and within the State. Before a business or industry qualifies to receive assistance under the
Customized Training Program, the President of the North Carolina Community College System
shall determine the following:
(1) The business is making an appreciable capital investment.
(2) The business is deploying new technology.
(3) The business or individual is creating jobs, expanding an existing workforce,
or enhancing the productivity and profitability of the operations within the
State.
(4) The skills of the workers will be enhanced by the assistance.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 15

(b) The Community Colleges System Office shall report no later than September 1 of
each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the following:
(1) The total amount of funds received by a company under the Customized
Training Program.
(2) The types of services sought by the company, whether for new, expanding, or
existing industry.
(3) The amount of funds per trainee received by that company.
(4) The amount of funds received per trainee by the community college delivering
the training.
(5) The number of trainees trained by the company and community college.
(6) The number of years that company has been funded.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Board of Community Colleges
may adopt guidelines that allow the Customized Training Program to use funds appropriated for
that program to support training projects for the various branches of the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(d) Funds available to the Customized Training Program shall not revert at the end of a
fiscal year but shall remain available until expended. Up to ten percent (10%) of the
college-delivered training expenditures and up to five percent (5%) of the contractor-delivered
training expenditures for the prior fiscal year for Customized Training may be allotted to each
college for capacity building at that college.
(e) Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Program, the
State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to eight percent (8%) for the
training and support of regional community college personnel to deliver Customized Training
Program services to business and industry.
(f) The State Board shall adopt guidelines to implement this section. At least 20 days
before the effective date of any criteria or nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the State
Board must publish the proposed guidelines on the Community Colleges System Office's website
and provide notice to persons who have requested notice of proposed guidelines. In addition, the
State Board must accept oral and written comments on the proposed guidelines during the 15
business days beginning on the first day that the State Board has completed these notifications.
For the purpose of this subsection, a technical amendment is either of the following:
(1) An amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error.
(2) An amendment that makes a clarification based on public comment and could
have been anticipated by the public notice that immediately preceded the
public comment.
"§ 115D-10.19. Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
(a) Program Established. – There is established the North Carolina Community College
Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program (Program) to be administered by the State
Board of Community Colleges. The State Board shall adopt rules for the disbursement of the
grants pursuant to this section.
(b) Programs of Study. – The State Board of Community Colleges, in collaboration with
the Department of Commerce, shall determine the eligible programs of study for the Program,
according to the occupations that are in the highest demand in the State. The eligible programs
of study shall include programs such as architecture and construction, health sciences,
information technology, electrical line worker, and manufacturing programs and may include
other programs to meet local workforce needs.
(c) Award Amounts. – To the extent funds are made available for the Program, the State
Board of Community Colleges shall award grants in an amount of up to seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) to students pursuing short-term, noncredit State and industry workforce
credentials. The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish criteria for initial and
continuing eligibility for students. At a minimum, students shall be required to qualify as a
Page 16 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1 and in accordance with
the coordinated and centralized residency determination process administered by the State
Education Assistance Authority.
(d) Report. – The State Board shall submit a report by April 1 annually on the Program
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division. The
report shall contain, for each academic year and by programs of study, the amount of grant funds
disbursed and the number of eligible students receiving funds.
"§ 115D-10.21. Training programs for students with intellectual and developmental
disabilities.
(a) The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a community college training
program for up to 15 community colleges. The program shall provide opportunities for
micro-credentials or other credentials that lead to increased employment outcomes for
individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities (IDD). To the extent funds are
appropriated for this purpose, the program shall improve the ability of participating community
colleges to offer training and educational components that include improving employability skills
and providing on-the-job training and apprenticeships with business and industry for individuals
with IDD. The goal of the program shall be to inform community colleges and address
cross-departmental supports within the individual community colleges on programs for
individuals with IDD related to at least the following:
(1) Establishing best practices for providing vocational training for individuals
with IDD.
(2) Providing financial and benefits counseling.
(3) Developing strategies on integrating assistive technology.
(4) Maximizing access, with supports, to credential and degree programs,
including micro-credentials that are established by the State Board.
(5) Identifying methods to increase orientation and integration of individuals with
IDD into the college community to the greatest extent possible.
(6) Determining a needs assessment, marketing, and evaluation to serve a broad
array of individuals with developmental and other similar disabilities or
learning challenges to assure adequate demand for new or existing programs.
(b) No later than May 1 of each year, the Community Colleges System Office shall report
on the funds appropriated to the System Office for the purposes of this section to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division. At a minimum,
the report shall address the impact of the program, the use of any additional positions created at
community colleges, professional development training for staff, and funding sources identified
for individuals with IDD to build programs at community colleges that support postsecondary
trainings and certifications that enable individuals with IDD to engage in competitive, sustainable
employment.
"§ 115D-10.25. Commercial fishing and aquaculture classes.
(a) The General Assembly urges all community colleges serving the coastal area of the
State to offer classes on commercial fishing and aquaculture.
(b) The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall provide technical
assistance to these colleges on offering such classes.
(c) The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on any fiscal and administrative issues it identifies
that limit colleges' ability to offer such courses.
"§ 115D-10.30. Correction education programs.
(a) Approval. – No course of instruction shall be offered by any community college at
State expense or partial State expense to any captive or co-opted group of students, as defined by
the State Board of Community Colleges, without prior approval of the State Board. All course
offerings approved for State prison inmates or prisoners in local jails must be tied to clearly
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 17

identified job skills, transition needs, or both. Approval by the State Board shall be presumed to
constitute approval of both the course and the group served by that institution. The State Board
may delegate to the President the power to make an initial approval, with final approval to be
made by the State Board. A course taught without such approval will not yield any full-time
equivalent students, as defined by the State Board. Community colleges shall report full-time
equivalent (FTE) student hours for correction education programs on the basis of student
membership hours. Funds appropriated for community college courses for prison inmates shall
be used only for inmates in State prisons. The first priority for the use of these funds shall be to
restore the FTE for basic skills courses to the FY 2008-2009 level. Funds not needed for this
purpose may be used for continuing education and curriculum courses related to job skills
training. No community college shall operate a multi-entry/multi-exit class or program in a prison
facility, except for a literacy class or program. The State Board shall work with the Division of
Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety on offering classes and
programs that match the average length of stay of an inmate in a prison facility.
(b) Courses in Federal Prisons. – Courses in federal prisons shall not earn regular budget
full-time equivalents but may be offered on a self-supporting basis.
"§ 115D-10.35. Teacher residency licensure courses.
The North Carolina Community College System may offer courses, in accordance with
Article 17D of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, to individuals who choose
to enter the teaching profession through residency licensure.
"§ 115D-10.40. American Sign Language courses.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop curriculum and continuing education
standards for courses of instruction in American Sign Language and shall encourage community
colleges to offer courses in American Sign Language as a modern foreign language.
"§ 115D-10.45. Adult high school equivalency diploma test.
The State Board of Community Colleges may establish, retain, and budget fees charged to
students taking an adult high school equivalency diploma test, including fees for retesting. Fees
collected for this purpose shall be used only to (i) offset the costs of the test, including the cost
of scoring the test, (ii) offset the costs of printing adult high school equivalency diplomas, and
(iii) meet federal and State reporting requirements related to the test.
"§ 115D-10.50. Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program.
(a) There is created a Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program for the purpose of
establishing statewide motorcycle safety instruction to be delivered through the Community
Colleges System Office. The Program may be administered by a motorcycle safety coordinator
who shall be responsible for the planning, curriculum, and completion requirements of the
Program. The State Board of Community Colleges may elect a motorcycle safety coordinator
upon nomination of the President of the Community College System, and the compensation of
the motorcycle safety coordinator shall be fixed by the State Board upon recommendation of the
President of the Community College System pursuant to G.S. 115D-3. The State Board of
Community Colleges may contract with an appropriate public or private agency or person to
carry out the duties of the motorcycle safety coordinator.
(b) The Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program shall be implemented through the
Community Colleges System Office at institutions which choose to provide the Program. The
motorcycle safety coordinator shall select and facilitate the training and certification of
instructors who will implement the Program.
"Part 4. Students.
"§ 115D-10.65. Accreditation of secondary school located in North Carolina shall not be a
factor in admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational policies.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "accreditation" shall include certification or any
other similar approval process.
Page 18 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(b) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy that prohibits any
community college from soliciting or using information regarding the accreditation of a
secondary school located in North Carolina that a person attended as a factor affecting
admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational activity at the community college, unless
the accreditation was conducted by a State agency.
"§ 115D-10.70. Driving eligibility certificates.
(a) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt the following rules to assist
community colleges in their administration of procedures necessary to implement G.S. 20-11 and
G.S. 20-13.2:
(1) To establish the procedures a person who is or was enrolled in a community
college must follow and the requirements that person must meet to obtain a
driving eligibility certificate.
(2) To require the person who is required under G.S. 20-11(n) to sign the driving
eligibility certificate to provide the certificate if he or she determines that one
of the following requirements is met:
a. The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under
G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and is not subject to G.S. 20-11(n1).
b. The person seeking the certificate is eligible for the certificate under
G.S. 20-11(n)(1) and G.S. 20-11(n1).
(3) To provide for an appeal through the grievance procedures established by the
board of trustees of each community college by a person who is denied a
driving eligibility certificate.
(4) To define exemplary student behavior and to define what constitutes the
successful completion of a drug or alcohol treatment counseling program.
(b) The State Board shall develop policies as to when it is appropriate to notify the
Division of Motor Vehicles that a person who is or was enrolled in a community college no
longer meets the requirements for a driving eligibility certificate. The State Board also shall adopt
guidelines to assist the presidents of community colleges in their designation of representatives
to sign driving eligibility certificates.
(c) The State Board shall develop a form for the appropriate individuals to provide their
written, irrevocable consent for a community college to disclose to the Division of Motor
Vehicles that the student no longer meets the conditions for a driving eligibility certificate under
G.S. 20-11(n)(1) or G.S. 20-11(n1), if applicable, in the event that this disclosure is necessary to
comply with G.S. 20-11 or G.S. 20-13.2. Other than identifying under which statutory subsection
the student is no longer eligible, no other details or information concerning the student's school
record shall be released pursuant to this consent.
"§ 115D-10.75. Excused absences for religious observances.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall direct each community college to adopt a
policy that authorizes a minimum of two excused absences each academic year for religious
observances required by the faith of a student. The policy may require that the student provide
written notice of the request for an excused absence a reasonable time prior to the religious
observance. The policy shall also provide that the student shall be given the opportunity to make
up any tests or other work missed due to an excused absence for a religious observance.
"§ 115D-10.76. Excused absences for National Guard service members.
The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy to be applied uniformly
throughout the Community College System to provide that any student enrolled in a community
college who is a National Guard service member placed onto State active duty status during an
academic term shall be given an excused absence for the period of time the student is on active
duty. The policy shall further provide all of the following:
(1) The student shall be given the opportunity to make up any test or other work
missed during the excused absence.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 19

(2) The student shall be given the option, when feasible, to continue classes and
coursework during the academic term through online participation for the
period of time the student is placed on active duty.
(3) The student shall be given the option of receiving a temporary grade of
"incomplete (IN)" or "absent from the final exam (AB)" for any course that
the student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active
duty status; however, the student must complete the course requirements
within the period of time specified by the community college to avoid
receiving a failing grade for the course.
(4) The student shall be permitted to drop, with no penalty, any course that the
student was unable to complete as a result of being placed on State active duty
status."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115D-20(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) To apply the standards and requirements for admission and graduation of
students and other standards established by the State Board of Community
Colleges. Notwithstanding any law or administrative rule to the contrary, local
community colleges are permitted to offer the following programs:
a. Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges,
local community colleges may collaborate with public school units
and nonpublic schools to offer courses through the following
programs:
1. Repealed by Session Laws 2022-71, s. 3.2, effective July 8,
2022.
2. Academic transition pathways for qualified junior and senior
high school students that lead to a career technical education
certificate, diploma, or State or industry-recognized credential
and academic transition pathways for qualified freshmen and
sophomore high school students that lead to a career technical
education certificate or diploma in (i) industrial and
engineering technologies, (ii) agriculture and natural
resources, (iii) transportation technology, (iv) construction, or
(v) business technologies.
3. College transfer pathways requiring the successful completion
of 30 semester credit hours of transfer courses, including
English and mathematics, for the following students:
I. Qualified junior and senior high school students.
II. Qualified freshman and sophomore high school
students, if all of the following requirements are met:
A. The student is determined to be academically
gifted, have a demonstrated readiness for the
course material, and have the maturity to justify
admission to the community college by (i) the
community college president, (ii) the student's
high school principal or equivalent
administrator, and (iii) the academically gifted
coordinator, if one is employed by the high
school or local school administrative unit.
B. The student participates in academic advising
focused on the implications of being admitted
to college early with representatives from the
high school and the community college.
Page 20 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

C. The student's parent or guardian has given
consent for the student to participate.
a1. Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges,
local community colleges may collaborate with local school
administrative units to offer cooperative innovative high school
programs, as provided by Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the
General Statutes.
b. During the summer quarter, persons less than 16 years old may be
permitted to take noncredit courses on a self-supporting basis, subject
to rules of the State Board of Community Colleges.
c. High school students may be permitted to take noncredit courses in
safe driving on a self-supporting basis during the academic year or the
summer.
d. High school students 16 years and older may be permitted to take
noncredit courses, except adult basic skills, subject to rules
promulgated by the State Board of Community Colleges.
e. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, qualified
youth 15 years and older may be permitted to enroll in courses,
including certification-eligible courses, in fire training pursuant to
G.S. 95-25.5(n) and on a specialized course list approved by the State
Board of Community Colleges in accordance with
G.S. 115D-5(b)(2)."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 2 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115D-21.2. Accreditation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Accreditation cycle. – The period of time during which a community college
is accredited.
(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
(3) Regional accrediting agency. – One of the following accrediting agencies:
a. Higher Learning Commission.
b. Middle States Commission on Higher Education.
c. New England Commission on Higher Education.
d. Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.
e. Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges.
f. Western Association of Schools and Colleges Accrediting
Commission for Community and Junior Colleges.
(b) Prohibit Consecutive Accreditation by an Accrediting Agency. – A community
college shall not receive accreditation by an accrediting agency for consecutive accreditation
cycles except as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Accreditation Transfer Procedure. – A community college that pursues accreditation
with a different accrediting agency in accordance with this section shall pursue accreditation with
a regional accrediting agency. If the community college is not granted candidacy status by any
regional accrediting agency that is different from its current accrediting agency at least three
years prior to the expiration of its current accreditation, the community college may remain with
its current accrediting agency for an additional accreditation cycle.
(d) Certain Programs Exempt. – The requirements of this section do not apply to
professional, departmental, or certificate programs at community colleges that have specific
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 21

accreditation requirements or best practices, as identified by the State Board of Community
Colleges.
(e) Cause of Action. – A community college may bring a civil action, as follows:
(1) Against any person who makes a false statement to the accrediting agency of
the community college, if all of the following criteria are met:
a. The statement, if true, would mean the community college is out of
compliance with its accreditation standards.
b. The person made the statement with knowledge that the statement was
false or with reckless disregard as to whether it was false.
c. The accrediting agency conducted a review of the community college
as a proximate result of the statement.
d. The review caused the community college to incur costs.
(2) A community college that prevails on a cause of action initiated pursuant to
this subsection shall be entitled to the following:
a. Costs related to the review conducted by the accrediting agency,
including for the following:
1. Additional hours worked by community college personnel.
2. Contracted services, including outside legal counsel.
3. Travel, lodging, and food expenses.
4. Fees required by the agency.
b. Reasonable attorneys' fees.
c. Court costs."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115D-21.5 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(e) Article 2 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115D-21.10. Curriculum courses taught throughout year.
Community colleges may teach curriculum courses at any time during the year, including the
summer term. Student membership hours from these courses shall be counted when computing
full-time equivalent students (FTE) for use in budget funding formulas at the State level."
SECTION 1.(f) Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 2B.
"High School Programs.
"§ 115D-30.1. Career and College Promise Program.
(a) There is established the Career and College Promise Program to allow pathways for
qualified high school students to take community college courses without the payment of tuition.
(b) Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, local community
colleges may collaborate with public school units and nonpublic schools to offer courses through
the following programs:
(1) Academic transition pathways for qualified junior and senior high school
students that lead to a career technical education certificate, diploma, or State
or industry-recognized credential and academic transition pathways for
qualified freshmen and sophomore high school students that lead to a career
technical education certificate or diploma in one of the following:
a. Industrial and engineering technologies.
b. Agriculture and natural resources.
c. Transportation technology.
d. Construction.
e. Business technologies.
Page 22 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(2) College transfer pathways requiring the successful completion of 30 semester
credit hours of transfer courses, including English and mathematics, for the
following students:
a. Qualified junior and senior high school students.
b. Qualified freshmen and sophomore high school students, if all of the
following requirements are met:
1. The student is determined to be academically gifted, have a
demonstrated readiness for the course material, and have the
maturity to justify admission to the community college by (i)
the community college president, (ii) the student's high school
principal or equivalent administrator, and (iii) the academically
gifted coordinator, if one is employed by the high school or
local school administrative unit.
2. The student participates in academic advising focused on the
implications of being admitted to college early with
representatives from the high school and the community
college.
3. The student's parent or guardian has given consent for the
student to participate.
"§ 115D-30.5. Evaluation of Career and College Promise Program.
(a) Evaluation. – In addition to the evaluation of cooperative innovative high schools by
the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-238.55, the State Board of Community
Colleges, in conjunction with the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina, shall evaluate the success of students participating in the Career
and College Promise Program, including the College Transfer pathway and the Career and
Technical Education pathway.
(b) Metrics. – Success shall be measured by high school retention rates, high school
completion rates, high school dropout rates, certification and associate degree completion,
admission to four-year institutions, postgraduation employment in career or study-related fields,
and employer satisfaction of employees who participated in the programs. The evaluation shall
also include an analysis of the cost of students participating in each of the programs within the
Career and College Promise Program, including at least the following:
(1) Total enrollment funding, the number of budgeted full-time equivalent
students, and the number of students enrolled in courses through cooperative
innovative high schools, the College Transfer pathway, and the Career and
Technical Education pathway.
(2) The cost and number of waivers of tuition and registration fees provided for
students enrolled in courses through cooperative innovative high schools, the
College Transfer pathway, and the Career and Technical Education pathway.
(3) Any additional costs of a student attending courses on campus if a student is
not attending public school in a local school administrative unit for the
majority of the student's instructional time.
(c) Report. – The Boards shall jointly report by March 15 of each year to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal
Research Division of the General Assembly. The report shall be combined with the evaluation
of cooperative innovative high schools required by G.S. 115C-238.55, and the Community
Colleges System Office shall be responsible for submitting the combined report.
"§ 115D-30.10. Cooperative innovative high schools.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 23

Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, local community colleges
may collaborate with local school administrative units to offer cooperative innovative high
school programs, as provided by Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
"§ 115D-30.15. Noncredit courses.
Subject to rules adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges, local community
colleges may provide for the following:
(1) During the summer quarter, persons less than 16 years old may be permitted
to take noncredit courses on a self-supporting basis.
(2) High school students may be permitted to take noncredit courses in safe
driving on a self-supporting basis during the academic year or the summer.
(3) High school students 16 years and older may be permitted to take noncredit
courses, except adult basic skills.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, qualified youth 15 years
and older may be permitted to enroll in courses, including
certification-eligible courses, in fire training pursuant to G.S. 95-25.5(n) and
on a specialized course list approved by the State Board of Community
Colleges in accordance with G.S. 115D-30.1.
"§ 115D-30.20. Gateway to College Program.
The purpose of the first semester of the Gateway to College Program is to address additional
support to successfully complete the Program. Students may need to take developmental courses
necessary for the transition to more challenging courses; therefore, the State Board of Community
Colleges shall (i) permit high school students who are enrolled in Gateway to College Programs
to enroll in developmental courses based on an assessment of their individual student needs by a
high school and community college staff team and (ii) include this coursework in computing the
budget FTE for the colleges.
"§ 115D-30.25. NC Career Coach Program.
(a) Purpose. – There is established the NC Career Coach Program to place community
college career coaches in high schools to assist students with determining career goals and
identifying community college programs that would enable students to achieve these goals.
(b) Memorandum of Understanding. – The board of trustees of a community college and
a local board of education of a local school administrative unit within the service area of the
community college shall enter into a memorandum of understanding for the placement of career
coaches employed by the board of trustees of the community college in schools within the local
school administrative unit. At a minimum, the memorandum of understanding shall include the
following:
(1) Requirement that the community college provides the following:
a. Hiring, training, and supervision of career coaches. The board of
trustees may include a local board of education liaison on the hiring
committee to participate in the decision making regarding hiring for
the coach positions.
b. Salary, benefits, and all other expenses related to the employment of
the career coach. The coach will be an employee of the board of
trustees and will not be an agent or employee of the local board of
education.
c. Development of pedagogical materials and technologies needed to
enhance the advising process.
d. Criminal background checks required by the local school
administrative unit for employees working directly with students.
e. Agreement that, while on any school campus, the career coach will
obey all local board of education rules and will be subject to the
authority of the school building administration.
Page 24 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

(2) Requirement that the local school administrative unit provides the following
to career coaches:
a. Access to student records, as needed to carry out the coach's job
responsibilities.
b. Office space on site appropriate for student advising.
c. Information technology resources, including, but not limited to,
internet access, telephone, and copying.
d. Initial school orientation and ongoing integration into the faculty and
staff community.
e. Promotion of school-wide awareness of coach duties.
f. Facilitation of the coach's access to individual classes and larger
assemblies for the purposes of awareness building.
(c) Application for NC Career Coach Program Funding. – The board of trustees of a
community college and a local board of education of a local school administrative unit within the
service area of the community college jointly may apply for available funds for NC Career Coach
Program funding from the State Board of Community Colleges. The State Board of Community
Colleges shall establish a process for award of funds as follows:
(1) Advisory committee. – Establishment of an advisory committee, which shall
include representatives from the NC Community College System, the
Department of Public Instruction, the Department of Commerce, and at least
three representatives of the business community, to review applications and
make recommendations for funding awards to the State Board.
(2) Application submission requirements. – The State Board of Community
Colleges shall require at least the following:
a. Evidence of a signed memorandum of understanding that meets, at a
minimum, the requirements of this section.
b. Evidence that the funding request will be matched with local funds in
accordance with the following:
1. Matching funds may come from public or private sources.
2. The match amount shall be determined based on the
development tier designation of the county in which the local
school administrative unit is located where the career coach is
assigned on the date of the award of funds by the State Board
of Community Colleges according to the following:
I. If located in a tier one county as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08, no local match shall be required.
II. If located in a tier two county as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08, one dollar ($1.00) of local funds for
every two dollars ($2.00) in State funds shall be
required.
III. If located in a tier three county as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08, one dollar ($1.00) of local funds for
every one dollar ($1.00) in State funds shall be
required.
(3) Awards criteria. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop
criteria for consideration in determining the award of funds that shall include
the following:
a. Consideration of the workforce needs of business and industry in the
region.
b. Targeting of resources to enhance ongoing economic activity within
the community college service area and surrounding counties.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 25

c. Geographic diversity of awards.
(d) Annual Report. –
(1) The board of trustees of a community college that employs one or more career
coaches shall report annually to the State Board of Community Colleges on
implementation and outcomes of the Program, including the following
information:
a. Number of career coaches employed.
b. Number of local school administrative units served and names of
schools in which career coaches are placed.
c. Number of students annually counseled by career coaches.
d. Impact of career coaches on student choices, as determined by a valid
measure selected by the State Board of Community Colleges.
(2) The State Board of Community Colleges shall report annually no later than
October 1 to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the
following:
a. A compilation of the information reported by the board of trustees of
community colleges, as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
b. Number and names of partnership applicants for NC Career Coach
Program funding.
c. Number, names, and amounts of those awarded NC Career Coach
Program funding."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 115D-39, 115D-39.1, 115D-40.1, and 115D-40.5 are codified
into Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes, which shall be entitled "Tuition
and Fees." The remaining sections of Article 3 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes are
codified into Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes, which shall be entitled
"Funding of Community Colleges."
SECTION 1.(h) Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is
amended by adding new sections to read:
"§ 115D-39.2. Pro rata tuition and uniform registration fees.
In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of curricular
courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from institution
campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata portion of
the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a part-time student
taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of Community
Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform registration fees, to
be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is financed primarily
from State funds.
"§ 115D-39.5. Tuition waivers.
(a) Allowed Tuition Waivers. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall not waive
tuition and registration fees for any individuals, except the State Board may, as provided by
general and uniform regulations, waive tuition and registration fees for the following:
(1) Persons not enrolled in elementary or secondary schools taking courses
leading to a high school diploma or equivalent certificate.
(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board:
a. Volunteer fire departments.
b. Municipal, county, or State fire departments.
c. Volunteer EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
d. Municipal, county, or State EMS or rescue and lifesaving departments.
Page 26 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

e. Law enforcement, fire, or EMS or rescue and lifesaving entities
serving a lake authority that was created by a county board of
commissioners prior to July 1, 2012.
f. Radio Emergency Associated Communications Teams (REACT)
under contract to a county as an emergency response agency.
g. Municipal, county, or State law enforcement agencies.
h. Campus police agencies of private institutions of higher education
certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the
General Statutes.
i. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the
Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the
training of full-time custodial employees and employees of the
Divisions required to be certified under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of
the General Statutes and the rules of the Criminal Justice and Training
Standards Commission.
j. The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians law enforcement, fire, or EMS
or rescue and lifesaving tribal government departments or programs.
k. The Criminal Justice Standards Division of the Department of Justice
for the training of criminal justice professionals, as defined in
G.S. 17C-20(6), who are required to be certified under (i) Article 1 of
Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the North
Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission or (ii) Chapter 17E of the General Statutes and the rules
of the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards
Commission. The waivers provided for in this sub-subdivision apply
to participants and recent graduates of the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Fellows Program to obtain certifications for eligible criminal
justice professions, as defined in G.S. 17C-20(6).
(3) Firefighters, EMS personnel, and rescue and lifesaving personnel whose duty
station is located on a military installation within North Carolina for courses
that support their organizations' training needs and are approved for this
purpose by the State Board.
(4) Trainees enrolled in courses conducted under the Customized Training
Program.
(5) Elementary and secondary school employees enrolled in courses in first aid or
cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).
(6) All courses taken by high school students at community colleges, in
accordance with this section and Article 2B of this Chapter.
(7) Human resources development courses for any individual who (i) is
unemployed, (ii) has received notification of a pending layoff, (iii) is working
and is eligible for the Federal Earned Income Tax Credit (FEITC), or (iv) is
working and earning wages at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the
federal poverty guidelines.
(8) Courses providing employability skills, job-specific occupational or technical
skills, or developmental education instruction to certain students who are
concurrently enrolled in an eligible community college literacy course, in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board.
(9) Courses provided to students who are participating in a pre-apprenticeship or
apprenticeship program that meets all of the following criteria:
a. Meets one of the following:
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 27

1. Is a registered apprenticeship program recognized by the
United States Department of Labor.
2. Is a pre-apprenticeship program recognized and approved by
the State agency administering the statewide apprenticeship
program.
b. Has a documented plan of study with courses relating to a job-specific
occupational or technical skill.
c. Requires the participants in the program to be North Carolina high
school students when entering the program.
(b) Faculty and Staff. – The State Board shall not waive tuition and registration fees for
community college faculty or staff members. Community colleges may, however, use State or
local funds to pay tuition and registration fees for one course per semester for full-time
community college faculty or staff members employed for a nine-, 10-, 11-, or 12-month term.
Community colleges may also use State and local funds to pay tuition and registration fees for
professional development courses and for other courses consistent with the academic assistance
program authorized by the State Human Resources Commission.
(c) Annual Report. – Annually by February 1, the Community Colleges System Office
shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the number and type of
waivers granted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 115D-41 is recodified as G.S. 115D-38.5.
SECTION 1.(j) G.S. 115D-43 is recodified as G.S. 115D-38.10.
SECTION 1.(k) G.S. 115D-44 is repealed.
PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-11(n) reads as rewritten:
"(n) Driving Eligibility Certificate. – A person who desires to obtain a permit or license
issued under this section must have a high school diploma or its equivalent or must have a driving
eligibility certificate. A driving eligibility certificate must meet the following conditions:
(1) The person who is required to sign the certificate under subdivision (4) of this
subsection must show that he or she has determined that one of the following
requirements is met:
a. The person is currently enrolled in school and is making progress
toward obtaining a high school diploma or its equivalent.
b. A substantial hardship would be placed on the person or the person's
family if the person does not receive a certificate.
c. The person cannot make progress toward obtaining a high school
diploma or its equivalent.
(1a) The person who is required to sign the certificate under subdivision (4) of this
subsection also must show that one of the following requirements is met:
a. The person who seeks a permit or license issued under this section is
not subject to subsection (n1) of this section.
b. The person who seeks a permit or license issued under this section is
subject to subsection (n1) of this section and is eligible for the
certificate under that subsection.
(2) It must be on a form approved by the Division.
(3) It must be dated within 30 days of the date the person applies for a permit or
license issuable under this section.
(4) It must be signed by the applicable person named below:
a. The principal, or the principal's designee, of the public school in which
the person is enrolled.
Page 28 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

b. The administrator, or the administrator's designee, of the nonpublic
school in which the person is enrolled.
c. The person who provides the academic instruction in the home school
in which the person is enrolled.
c1. The person who provides the academic instruction in the home in
accordance with an educational program found by a court, prior to July
1, 1998, to comply with the compulsory attendance law.
d. The designee of the board of directors of the charter school in which
the person is enrolled.
e. The president, or the president's designee, of the community college
in which the person is enrolled.
Notwithstanding any other law, the decision concerning whether a driving eligibility
certificate was properly issued or improperly denied shall be appealed only as provided under
the rules adopted in accordance with G.S. 115C-12(28), 115D-5(a3), 115D-10.70, or 115C-566,
whichever is applicable, and may not be appealed under this Chapter."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 20-13.2(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) Upon receipt of notification from the proper school authority that a person no longer
meets the requirements for a driving eligibility certificate under G.S. 20-11(n), the Division must
expeditiously notify the person that his or her permit or license is revoked effective on the
thirtieth calendar day after the mailing of the revocation notice. The Division must revoke the
permit or license of that person on the thirtieth calendar day after the mailing of the revocation
notice. Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, the length of revocation must last for the
following periods:
(1) If the revocation is because of ineligibility for a driving eligibility certificate
under G.S. 20-11(n)(1), then the revocation shall last until the person's
eighteenth birthday.
(2) If the revocation is because of ineligibility for a driving eligibility certificate
under G.S. 20-11(n1), then the revocation shall be for a period of one year.
For a person whose permit or license was revoked due to ineligibility for a driving eligibility
certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1), the Division must restore a person's permit or license before
the person's eighteenth birthday, if the person submits to the Division one of the following:
(1) A high school diploma or its equivalent.
(2) A driving eligibility certificate as required under G.S. 20-11(n).
If the Division restores a permit or license that was revoked due to ineligibility for a driving
eligibility certificate under G.S. 20-11(n)(1), any record of revocation or suspension shall be
expunged by the Division from the person's driving record. The Division shall not expunge a
suspension or revocation record if a person has had a prior expunction from the person's driving
record for any reason.
For a person whose permit or license was revoked due to ineligibility for a driving eligibility
certificate under G.S. 20-11(n1), the Division shall restore a person's permit or license before the
end of the revocation period, if the person submits to the Division a driving eligibility certificate
as required under G.S. 20-11(n).
Notwithstanding any other law, the decision concerning whether a driving eligibility
certificate was properly issued or improperly denied shall be appealed only as provided under
the rules adopted in accordance with G.S. 115C-12(28), 115D-5(a3), 115D-10.70, or 115C-566,
whichever is applicable, and may not be appealed under this Chapter."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 90-631(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A massage and bodywork therapy program operated by a North Carolina community
college that is accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-6.2,
G.S. 115D-21.2, is exempt from the approval process, licensure process, or both, established by
the Board. The college shall certify annually to the Board that the program meets or exceeds the
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 29

minimum standards for curriculum, faculty, and learning resources established by the Board.
Students who complete the program shall qualify for licenses from the Board as if the program
were approved, licensed, or both, by the Board."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 93A-4(a2) reads as rewritten:
"(a2) A certified real estate education provider shall pay a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per
licensee to the Commission for each licensee completing a postlicensing education course
conducted by the school, provided that these fees shall not be charged to a community college,
junior college, college, or university located in this State and accredited by a regional accrediting
agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 93A-38.5(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) The Commission may establish a nonrefundable course application fee to be charged
to private real estate education providers for the review and approval of a proposed continuing
education course. The fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per course.
The Commission may charge the private real estate education providers of an approved course a
nonrefundable fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for the annual renewal of course
approval.
A private real estate education provider shall pay a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per licensee to
the Commission for each licensee completing an approved continuing education course
conducted by the sponsor.
The Commission shall not charge a course application fee, a course renewal fee, or any other
fee for a continuing education course sponsored by a community college, junior college, college,
or university located in this State and accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as defined in
G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 93E-1-7(b2) reads as rewritten:
"(b2) The Board shall not charge a course application fee, a course renewal fee, or any other
fee for a continuing education course offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior
college, or community or technical college accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as
defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or an agency of the
federal, State, or local government."
SECTION 2.(g) G.S. 93E-1-8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93E-1-8. Education program approval and fees.
…
(b) The Board may by rule set nonrefundable fees chargeable to private real estate
appraisal schools or course sponsors, including appraisal trade organizations, for the approval
and annual renewal of approval of their qualifying courses required by G.S. 93E-1-6(a), or
equivalent courses. The fees shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course for approval and
fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. No fees shall be charged for the approval
or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser qualifying courses where such courses are offered
by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community or technical college
accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2 and
G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or an agency of the federal, State, or local government.
…
(d) Nonrefundable fees of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course may be charged to
schools and course sponsors for the approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses
and fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. However, no fees shall be charged
for the approval or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses where
such courses are offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community
or technical college accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-6.2
G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or by an agency of the federal, State, or local
government. A nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per course may be charged to current
or former licensees or certificate holders requesting approval by the Board of a course for
Page 30 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

continuing education credit when approval of such course has not been previously obtained by
the offering school or course sponsor."
SECTION 2.(h) G.S. 95-25.5(n) reads as rewritten:
"(n) Nothing in this section prohibits qualified youths under 18 years of age from
participating in training through their fire department, the Office of State Fire Marshal, or the
North Carolina Community College System. As used in this subsection, the term "qualified youth
under 18 years of age" means an uncompensated fire department or rescue squad member who
is at least the age of 15 and under the age of 18 and who is a member of a bona fide fire
department, as that term is defined in G.S. 58-86-2(4), or of a rescue squad described in
G.S. 58-86-2(6). A qualified youth under 18 years of age under this subsection may be permitted
to enroll in courses, including certification-eligible courses, in fire training at a community
college on a specialized course list approved by the State Board of Community Colleges pursuant
to G.S. 115D-20(4)e.G.S. 115D-30.15(4)."
SECTION 2.(i) G.S. 115C-84.3(a)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Institution of higher education courses, as provided in Article 16 of this
Chapter or G.S. 115D-20(4).Article 2B of Chapter 115D of the General
Statutes."
SECTION 2.(j) G.S. 115C-238.55 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-238.55. Evaluation of cooperative innovative high schools.
The State Board of Education and the governing Boards shall evaluate the success of students
in cooperative innovative high schools approved under this Part. Success shall be measured by
high school retention rates, high school completion rates, high school dropout rates, certification
and associate degree completion, admission to four-year institutions, postgraduation employment
in career or study-related fields, and employer satisfaction of employees who participated in and
graduated from the schools. The Boards shall jointly report by March 15 of each year to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal
Research Division of the General Assembly on the evaluation of these schools. The report shall
be combined with the evaluation of and analysis of cost of students participating in the Career
and College Promise Program required by G.S. 115D-5(x), G.S. 115D-30.5, and the Community
Colleges System Office shall be responsible for submitting the combined report."
SECTION 2.(k) G.S. 115D-2(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) The term "community college" is defined as an educational institution
operating under the provisions of this Chapter and dedicated primarily to the
educational needs of the service area which it serves, and may offer any of the
following:
a. The freshmen and sophomore courses of a college of arts and sciences,
authorized by G.S. 115D-4.1;G.S. 115D-10.10.
b. Organized credit curricula for the training of technicians; curricular
courses may carry transfer credit to a senior college or university
where the course is comparable in content and quality and is
appropriate to a chosen course of study;study.
c. Vocational, trade, and technical specialty courses and programs,
andprograms.
d. Courses in general adult education."
SECTION 2.(l) G.S. 115D-39(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) In addition, federal law enforcement officers, firefighters, EMS personnel, and rescue
and lifesaving personnel whose permanent duty station is within North Carolina and who do not
otherwise qualify for tuition waivers under G.S. 115D-5(b)(2a) G.S. 115D-39.5(a)(3) shall also
be eligible for the State resident community college tuition rate for courses that support their
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 31

organizations' training needs and are approved for this purpose by the State Board of Community
Colleges."
SECTION 2.(m) G.S. 115D-41(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Community college contracts with local school administrative units shall not be used
by these agencies to supplant funding for a public school high school teacher providing courses
offered pursuant to G.S. 115D-20(4) Article 2B of this Chapter who is already employed by the
local school administrative unit. In no event shall a community college contract with a local
school administrative unit to provide high school level courses."
SECTION 2.(n) Article 6A of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 2.(o) G.S. 116-201(b)(8) reads as rewritten:
"(8) "Private institution" means an institution other than a seminary, Bible school,
Bible college or similar religious institution in this State that is not owned or
operated by the State or any agency or political subdivision thereof, or by any
combination thereof, that offers post-high school education and is accredited
by a regional accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2
and G.S. 116-11.4, or the Transnational Association of Christian Colleges and
Schools, or, in the case of institutions that are not eligible to be considered for
accreditation, accredited in those categories and by those nationally
recognized accrediting agencies that the Authority may designate;"
SECTION 2.(p) G.S. 116-280(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Eligible private postsecondary institution. – A school that is any of the
following:
a. A nonprofit postsecondary educational institution with a main
permanent campus located in this State that is not owned or operated
by the State of North Carolina or by an agency or political subdivision
of the State or by any combination thereof that satisfies all of the
following:
1. Is either (i) accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as
defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4,
or the Transnational Association of Christian Colleges and
Schools or (ii) was accredited by SACSCOC the Southern
Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges
on January 1, 2021, and, beginning January 1, 2021, was a
member of the Transnational Association of Christian Colleges
and Schools.
2. Awards a postsecondary degree as defined in G.S. 116-15.
b. A postsecondary institution owned or operated by a hospital authority
as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14) or school of nursing affiliated with a
nonprofit postsecondary educational institution as defined in
sub-subdivision a. of this subsection."
SECTION 2.(q) G.S. 126-5(c2)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Employees of community colleges whose salaries are fixed in accordance with
G.S. 115D-5 G.S. 115D-6.1 and G.S. 115D-20 and employees of the
Community Colleges System Office whose salaries are fixed by the State
Board of Community Colleges in accordance with G.S. 115D-3."
SECTION 2.(r) Section 6.9(b) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 6.9.(b) Of the recurring funds appropriated in this act to the Community
Colleges System Office for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to support increasing program
offerings for individuals with IDD pursuant to G.S. 115D-44, as enacted by this section,
G.S. 115D-10.21, the System Office shall establish at least two statewide positions for program
support, provide professional development training for college advising staff to assist students
Page 32 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

with IDD for career pathway exploration and the identification of credentials leading to
competitive employment, and explore funding sources to sustain programs for students with
IDD."
PART II.5. VARIOUS STATUTORY CHANGES
SECTION 2.5.(a) G.S. 115D-10.17(e), as enacted by this act, reads as rewritten:
"(e) Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Program, the
State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to eight percent (8%) fifteen
percent (15%) for the training and support of regional community college personnel to deliver
Customized Training Program services to business and industry."
SECTION 2.5(b) G.S. 115D-30.1(b), as enacted by this act, reads as rewritten:
"(b) Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, local community
colleges may collaborate with public school units and nonpublic schools to offer courses through
the following programs:
(1) Academic transition pathways for qualified junior and senior high school
students that lead to a career technical education certificate, diploma, or State
or industry-recognized credential.credential and academic transition pathways
for qualified freshmen and sophomore high school students that lead to a
career technical education certificate or diploma in one of the following:
a. Industrial and engineering technologies.
b. Agriculture and natural resources.
c. Transportation technology.
d. Construction.
e. Business technologies.
…
(3) Career and College Ready Graduate pathways introducing college
developmental mathematics and developmental English and reading curricula
in the junior or senior year of high school, including the immediately
preceding summers of those years, and providing opportunities for college
remediation for students prior to high school graduation, ensuring students are
prepared for college and career success as they transition from high school to
higher education."
SECTION 2.5.(c) G.S. 115D-30.25, as enacted by this act, is amended by adding a
new subsection to read:
"(e) Administrative Costs. – The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office may
use up to four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated for the NC Career Coach Program for
administrative costs, including system office staffing, professional development, and program
management and evaluation. These funds shall be utilized to enhance the effectiveness and
sustainability of the program, ensuring its continued support for students within the community
college system. The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall have the authority
to allocate and oversee the utilization of these administrative funds in alignment with the
Program's goals and requirements."
SECTION 2.5.(d) G.S. 115D-31.3(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Mandatory Performance Measures. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall
evaluate each college on the following performance measures:
(1) Progress of basic skills students.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.
(3) Performance of students who transfer to a four-year institution.
(3a) Success rate of students in credit-bearing English courses.
(3b) Success rate of students in credit-bearing Math or Science courses.
(4), (5) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 33

(5a) Progress of first-year curriculum students.
(6) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.
(7) Curriculum student retention and graduation.
(8) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.
(9) Attainment of licensure and certifications by students.
The State Board may also evaluate each college on additional performance measures."
SECTION 2.5.(e) The following provisions are repealed:
(1) Section 10.13 of S.L. 2015-241.
(2) Section 10.5 of S.L. 2016-94.
(3) Section 9.4 of S.L. 2018-5.
(4) Section 3J.19 of S.L. 2024-57.
SECTION 2.5.(f) This section applies beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year.
PART III. RESIDENCY LICENSES FOR CERTAIN NONPUBLIC EC TEACHERS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-270.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.1. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions shall apply:
…
(1b) Individualized education program (IEP). – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(2) Professional educator. – An administrator, teacher, or student services
personnel.
(3) Recognized educator preparation program or recognized EPP. – As defined in
G.S. 115C-269.1(15).
(3a) Related services. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(3b) Special education. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-270.20(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Teacher Licenses. – The State Board shall adopt rules for the issuance of the following
classes of teacher licenses, including required levels of preparation for each classification:
…
(5) Residency License or RL. – A one-year license, renewable twice, that meets
both of the following requirements:
a. Is requested by the governing body of a public school unit an eligible
entity and accompanied by a certification of supervision from the
recognized educator preparation program in which the individual is
enrolled. For the purposes of this sub-subdivision, an eligible entity is
one of the following:
1. The governing body of a public school unit.
2. A nonpublic school that meets all of the following:
I. Meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39
of this Chapter.
II. Is approved and monitored by the Department of Public
Instruction to provide special education and related
services pursuant to a student's IEP.
b. The individual for whom the license is requested meets all of the
following requirements:
1. Holds at least one of the following:
I. A bachelor's degree.
II. An advanced degree.
2. Has either completed coursework relevant to the requested
licensure area or passed the content area examination relevant
Page 34 Session Law 2025-56 Senate Bill 125

to the requested licensure area that has been approved by the
State Board.
3. Is enrolled in a recognized educator preparation program.
4. Meets all other requirements established by the State Board,
including completing preservice requirements prior to
teaching.
…."
SECTION 3.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
applications for residency licenses occurring on or after that date.
PART IV. EXTEND REVERSION DATE FOR SCHOOL SAFETY GRANT FUNDS
SECTION 4.(a) Section 7.36(l) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.36.(l) Nonrevert. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction in the 2022-2023 fiscal
year for the 2021-2023 School Safety Grants Program under Section 7.19 of S.L. 2021-180 and
the nonrecurring funds appropriated by this act to the Department of Public Instruction for the
2023-2025 School Safety Grants Program shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain
available for the purposes for which they were appropriated until June 30, 2025.June 30, 2027."
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025.
PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:19 a.m. this 3rd day of July, 2025
Senate Bill 125 Session Law 2025-56 Page 35